Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3329
Advertising; offer of services; limitation.

(1) Only a licensed veterinarian may advertise or offer his or her services in a manner calculated to lead others to believe that he or she is a licensed veterinarian.

(2) Only a licensed veterinary technician may advertise or offer his or her services in a manner calculated to lead others to believe that he or she is a licensed veterinary technician.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1111.